Utah statutes.
20A-3-407.   Mailing of ballot to military voter.

(1) (a)  Upon receipt of the military or overseas citizen voter's application for a ballot, or as soon after receipt as the ballot for the voting precinct in which the applicant resides has been printed, the county clerk shall:

(i)  enclose a ballot in an unsealed ballot envelope printed as required in Subsection 20A-3-405(1)(b);

(ii)  enclose that envelope in a carrier envelope; and

(iii)  mail, postage prepaid, the carrier envelope containing the unsealed ballot envelope and the ballot to the military or overseas citizen voter.

(b)  The county clerk may not send more than one ballot in any election to the same military or overseas citizen voter.

(2)  The county clerk shall ensure that the name, official title, return address of the county clerk, and "OFFICIAL UTAH ELECTION BALLOT" is printed on the carrier envelope.

(3) (a)  The county clerk may enclose only the ballot, the ballot envelope, and an instruction sheet, if any, prepared by the county clerk in the sealed carrier envelope addressed to the military or overseas citizen voter.

(b)  Both envelopes may be made of light weight paper.

